Washington statutes.
RCW 36.72.075

Official county newspaper.

At its first April meeting, the county legislative authority shall let a contract to a legal newspaper qualified under this section to serve as the official county newspaper for the term of one year beginning on the first day of July following. If there be at least one legal newspaper published in the county, the contract shall be let to a legal newspaper published in the county. If there be no legal newspaper published in the county, the county legislative authority shall let the contract to a legal newspaper published in an adjacent county and having general circulation in the county.

When two or more legal newspapers are qualified under the provisions of this section to be the official county newspaper, the clerk of the county legislative authority shall advertise, at least five weeks before the meeting at which the county legislative authority shall let the contract for the official county newspaper, for bid proposals to be submitted by interested qualified legal newspapers. Advertisement of the opportunity to bid shall be mailed to all qualified legal newspapers and shall be published once in the official county newspaper. The advertisement may designate the form which notices shall take, and may require that the successful bidder provide a bond for the correct and faithful performance of the contract.

The county legislative authority shall let the contract to the best and lowest responsible bidder, giving consideration to the question of circulation in awarding the contract, with a view to giving publication of notices the widest publicity.

[ 2017 c 37 s 3; 1977 c 34 s 2.]